Washington statutes.
RCW 4.32.140

Setoff in probate actions against personal representatives.

In actions against executors and administrators and against trustees and others, sued in their representative character, the defendants may set off demands belonging to their testators or intestates or those whom they represent, in the same manner as the person so represented would have been entitled to set off the same, in an action against them.

[Code 1881 s 501; 1877 p 107 s 505; RRS s 270.]